District of Columbia statutes.
6-102.03

Authority considered a public housing agency.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the Authority shall be considered a public housing agency within the meaning of, and to carry out the purposes of, the United States Housing Act of 1937 [42 U.S.C. § 1437 et seq.]; and as such, the Authority is empowered to borrow money or accept contributions, grants or other financial assistance from the United States Housing Authority for or in aid of any housing project in the District of Columbia, in accordance with the United States Housing Act of 1937 to take over or lease or manage any such housing project or undertaking constructed, owned, or operated by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development and to those ends to comply with such conditions and enter into such mortgages, trust indentures, leases, or agreements as may be necessary, convenient, or desirable; provided, that the tax exemption of the property of the Authority shall be deemed a contribution by the District of Columbia in accordance with the local contributions requirements of § 1437 et seq. of Title 42, United States Code. It is the purpose and intent of this subchapter to authorize the Authority to do any and all things necessary to secure the financial aid of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development in the undertaking, construction, maintenance, or operation in the District of Columbia of any housing project by the Authority.

June 12, 1934, ch. 465, title II, § 203
June 25, 1938, 52 Stat. 1188, ch. 691, § 5
1973 Ed., § 5-114.
1981 Ed., § 5-113.

The reference to § 1437 et seq. of Title 42 of the United States Code has been substituted for former references to § 1410(a) and § 1411(f) of Title 42, United States Code. Former §§ 1410(a) and 1411(f) of Title 42, United States Code, were omitted as superseded in the general revision of the United States Housing Act of 1937 by the Act of August 22, 1974, 88 Stat. 653, Pub. L. 93-383, § 201(a).

The United States Housing Act of 1937, referred to twice in the first sentence, is the Act of September 1, 1937, ch. 896.